Utah statutes.
19-6-1003.   Board and director powers.

(1)  By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board shall make rules:

(a)  governing administrative proceedings under this part;

(b)  specifying the terms and conditions under which the director shall approve, disapprove, revoke, or review a plan submitted by a manufacturer; and

(c)  governing reports and educational materials required by this part.

(2)  These rules shall include:

(a)  time requirements for plan submission, review, approval, and implementation;

(b)  a public notice and comment period for a proposed plan; and

(c)  safety standards for the collection, packaging, transportation, storage, recycling, and disposal of mercury switches.

(3)  The director may:

(a)  review and approve or disapprove plans, specifications, or other data related to mercury switch removal;

(b)  enforce a rule by issuing a notice, an order, or both;

(c)  initiate an administrative action to compel compliance with this part and any rules adopted under this part; or

(d)  request the attorney general to bring an action for injunctive relief and enforcement of this part, including imposition of the penalty described in Section 19-6-1006.

(4)  The director shall establish a fee to cover the costs of a plan's review by following the procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.

